Massachusetts, session 194th, H2922.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
Middlesex county retirement board shall increase the accidental disability retirement allowance
payable to John Moran, a retired police officer of the police department of the town of
Hopkinton who, as a result of injuries sustained while in the performance of his duties on July
24, 2017, is totally and permanently incapacitated from performing the essential duties of a
police officer.

(b) The annual amount of pension payable to John Moran shall be equal to the regular
rate of compensation which would have been paid had he continued in service as a police officer
of the town of Hopkinton at the grade held by him at the time of his retirement until his death or
of 3

reaching mandatory retirement age, whichever comes first. All amounts paid under this act shall
be non-taxable to the extent allowable under state and federal law.

(c) Notwithstanding section 91A of chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general
or special law to the contrary, John Moran’s annual earnings, when added to his retirement
allowance, may annually earn up to 1/2 the amount of his retirement allowance without refund
penalty.
(d) Upon attaining the mandatory retirement age for a police officer of the town of
Hopkinton, John Moran shall receive a pension, pursuant to section 7 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws, a yearly amount of pension equal to 80 per cent of the annual rate of the
compensation he was receiving on the day before he reaches the mandatory retirement age for a
police officer in the town of Hopkinton.
(e) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the benefits granted herein
shall be funded and administered by the Middlesex county retirement board, consistent with and
subject to chapter 32 of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, John Moran
shall be entitled to receive indemnification for all hospital, medical and related expenses that
have been or may be incurred after the date of his retirement as a result of the injuries sustained
by him while in the performance of his duties on July 24, 2017, in accordance with sections 100
and 100B of chapter 41 of the General Laws.
of 3

SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Middlesex
county retirement board shall forthwith pay to said John Moran the amount credited to him as
accumulated total deductions in the annuity savings fund of the Middlesex county retirement
board as of the effective date of this act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, if John Moran
was married upon retirement then, upon his death, if he is still married to the spouse he was
married to upon retirement then, should his said spouse to whom he was married on the date
upon retirement survive him, the Middlesex county retirement board shall pay to the said spouse
an annuity in the amount of 75 per cent of the amount of the pension which otherwise would
have been payable to John Moran until his said spouse’s death. The pension benefits provided for
in this section and section 1 shall be subject to section 103 of chapter 32 of the General Laws.
SECTION 5. In the event that both John Moran and his spouse to whom he was married
on the date upon retirement die before their children reach the age of 18 the payments that would
otherwise have been made to John Moran’s spouse shall be payable, per stirpes, to each
surviving child under the age of 18; provided, however, that payments shall continue for the
benefit of a surviving child 18 years or older who, on or before the date of death of John Moran
or his spouse to whom he was married on the date upon retirement, whichever is later, had been
medically determined to be permanently physically or mentally incapacitated from earning or for
the benefit of a child under the age of 22 who is enrolled as a full-time student as determined by
the criteria of the educational institution.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3